Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.aff
SFX K   cer  remos        facer
SFX K   cer  remos        dicer
SFX K   cer  rei          facer
SFX K   cer  rei          dicer
SFX K   cer  redes        facer
SFX K   cer  redes        dicer
SFX K   cer  n            dicer
SFX K   cer  i            facer
SFX K   cer  go           facer
SFX K   cer  go           dicer
SFX K   cer  gas          facer
SFX K   cer  gas          dicer
SFX K   cer  gan          facer
SFX K   cer  gan          dicer
SFX K   cer  gamos        facer
SFX K   cer  gamos        dicer
SFX K   cer  gades        facer
SFX K   cer  gades        dicer
SFX K   cer  ga           facer
SFX K   cer  ga           dicer
SFX K   acer ouvésemos    pracer
SFX K   acer ouvésedes    pracer
SFX K   acer ouvéramos    pracer
SFX K   acer ouvérades    pracer
SFX K   acer ouvo         pracer
SFX K   acer ouvestes     pracer
SFX K   acer ouveses      pracer
SFX K   acer ouvesen      pracer
SFX K   acer ouvese       pracer
SFX K   acer ouveron      pracer
SFX K   acer ouvermos     pracer
SFX K   acer ouveres      pracer
SFX K   acer ouveren      pracer
SFX K   acer ouverdes     pracer
SFX K   acer ouveras      pracer
SFX K   acer ouveran      pracer
SFX K   acer ouvera       pracer
SFX K   acer ouver        pracer
SFX K   acer ouven        pracer
SFX K   acer ouvemos      pracer
SFX K   acer ouveche      pracer
SFX K   acer ixésemos     facer
SFX K   acer ixésedes     facer
SFX K   acer ixéramos     facer
SFX K   acer ixérades     facer
SFX K   acer ixo          facer
SFX K   acer ixestes      facer
SFX K   acer ixeses       facer
SFX K   acer ixesen       facer
SFX K   acer ixese        facer
SFX K   acer ixeron       facer
SFX K   acer ixermos      facer
SFX K   acer ixeres       facer
SFX K   acer ixeren       facer
SFX K   acer ixerdes      facer
SFX K   acer ixeras       facer
SFX K   acer ixeran       facer
SFX K   acer ixera        facer
SFX K   acer ixer         facer
SFX K   acer ixen         facer
SFX K   acer ixemos       facer
SFX K   acer ixeche       facer
SFX K   acer eitos        facer
SFX K   acer eito         facer
SFX K   acer eitas        facer
SFX K   acer eita         facer
SFX K   0    íamos        vir
SFX K   0    íamos        ver
SFX K   0    íamos        ter
SFX K   0    íamos        pracer
SFX K   0    íamos        or
SFX K   0    íades        vir
SFX K   0    íades        ver
SFX K   0    íades        ter
SFX K   0    íades        pracer
SFX K   0    íades        or
SFX K   0    ás           vir
SFX K   0    ás           ver
SFX K   0    ás           ter
SFX K   0    ás           pracer
SFX K   0    ás           or
SFX K   0    án           vir
SFX K   0    án           ver
SFX K   0    án           ter
SFX K   0    án           pracer
SFX K   0    án           or
SFX K   0    á            vir
SFX K   0    á            ver
SFX K   0    á            ter
SFX K   0    á            pracer
SFX K   0    á            or
SFX K   0    mos          vir
SFX K   0    mos          ver
SFX K   0    mos          ter
SFX K   0    mos          pracer
SFX K   0    mos          or
SFX K   0    mos          facer
SFX K   0    mos          dicer
SFX K   0    ias          vir
SFX K   0    ias          ver
SFX K   0    ias          ter
SFX K   0    ias          pracer
SFX K   0    ias          or
SFX K   0    ian          vir
SFX K   0    ian          ver
SFX K   0    ian          ter
SFX K   0    ian          pracer
SFX K   0    ian          or
SFX K   0    ia           vir
SFX K   0    ia           ver
SFX K   0    ia           ter
SFX K   0    ia           pracer
SFX K   0    ia           or
SFX K   0    es           vir
SFX K   0    es           ver
SFX K   0    es           ter
SFX K   0    es           pracer
SFX K   0    es           or
SFX K   0    es           facer
SFX K   0    es           dicer
SFX K   0    en           vir
SFX K   0    en           ver
SFX K   0    en           ter
SFX K   0    en           pracer
SFX K   0    en           or
SFX K   0    en           facer
SFX K   0    en           dicer
SFX K   0    emos         vir
SFX K   0    emos         ver
SFX K   0    emos         ter
SFX K   0    emos         pracer
SFX K   0    emos         or
SFX K   0    ei           vir
SFX K   0    ei           ver
SFX K   0    ei           ter
SFX K   0    ei           pracer
SFX K   0    ei           or
SFX K   0    edes         vir
SFX K   0    edes         ver
SFX K   0    edes         ter
SFX K   0    edes         pracer
SFX K   0    edes         or
SFX K   0    des          vir
SFX K   0    des          ver
SFX K   0    des          ter
SFX K   0    des          pracer
SFX K   0    des          or
SFX K   0    des          facer
SFX K   0    des          dicer

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   r    dores        [aei]r
SFX D   r    doras        [aei]r
SFX D   r    dora         [aei]r
SFX D   r    dor          [aei]r

SFX C Y 8
SFX C   tar  cións        tar
SFX C   tar  ción         tar
SFX C   ir   cións        uir
SFX C   ir   ción         uir
SFX C   ir   ccións       air
SFX C   ir   cción        air
SFX C   ionar cións        cionar
SFX C   ionar ción         cionar
