Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.dic
abalizar/YXDp
abluir/nYXC
abnegar/YXDcp
animar/vcYXpD
asaltar/vYXpDn
atentar/pYXC
cazar/YXDp
descobrir/D
conformar/YXDcvp
conservar/YXDpc
delimitar/YXDp
despenalizar/Dc
destruir/YDoX
redistribuir/C
duplicar/vYXDcpn
elucubrar/YXnDp
embutir/YXDp
enxendrar/poYXD
esperanzar/YXDp
expirar/nYXDop
findar/YXDvp
frustrar/pYcXD
galantear/pYXD
galardoar/YXDp
gruñir/YXDp
imprensar/D
iniciar/pcYXD
lavar/YvXDnp
mercar/vYXDnp
mergullar/YXDp
ostentar/YXDpo
pacificar/cYXDp
parafusar/YXDp
pescar/YXDp
rectificar/cYXDvp
refractar/pYXC
refugar/YDXp
tecer/YXDp
urrar/YXDp
xerar/oYXDp
abanar/YXxDnp
abenzoar/YXDp
aclamar/YXcDpn
adubar/oYXDp
atracar/YXDxp
atribuir/voYXD
caluniar/YXDvp
clarificar/pcYXDo
colaborar/YXDcp
coordenar/cYXDp
decidir/YXDvp
desasosegar/pYXD
discutir/vYXDp
ecoar/nYXDp
empregar/YXDp
entolecer/YXDp
esconxurar/cYXDpv
estivar/YXDp
expatriar/pYXoD
falsar/YXDp
imaxinar/vDn
imolar/vYXDpc
reincidir/D
infectar/YXpC
instruir/YXDC
intentar/C
librar/YXDp
ministrar/pnYXD
modular/vpYXDn
negociar/pcYXDv
orixinar/YXDp
percutir/vYXpD
perder/YXDp
pluralizar/nYXDop
polarizar/YXcDvp
politizar/YXDvopn
prestar/pcYXD
recordar/vpYXD
reprimir/YXpDv
restituir/vYXDc
rillar/YXDp
rufar/xYXDp
serrar/YXDp
trepar/YXDnp
uniformizar/oYDXp
untar/YXCp
xeneralizar/vYDpoX
abstrair/vnYXC
ameazar/YXDp
apalpar/YXDxpn
aplaudir/YXDvp
aprobar/YXDpc
argumentar/pnYXcD
cantar/YXCp
categorizar/YXDvpo
censurar/YXDvp
centralizar/YXSpD
consumar/cYXDp
contribuir/YXDo
declarar/vnYXDpc
deglutir/YXvoDp
denominar/cYXDp
desmentir/D
enlamiar/YXDp
esterilizar/poYXD
execrar/YXDvp
executar/YXpC
influir/nDo
fundir/XncYDvp
gabionar/YXDp
imortalizar/pYXDc
inspirar/voYXDp
investigar/cYDXvp
ladrar/YXDp
loitar/YXDp
madurar/YXDpo
moderar/YXcDp
morar/YXDp
negar/vcYXDp
ouvir/pYDv
participar/nYXDvpc
posuir/YXDv
presumir/YDpXv
producir/vYXDnpc
quintar/YXpD
resuscitar/Dov
reunir/D
salvar/YDpX
varrer/YDXp
vender/YDXvp
abdicar/cYXvpDn
abochornar/YXDp
abominar/vcYXDp
acompañar/pnYXD
aconsellar/YXDvp
argallar/nYXDp
asistir/nYXDpv
blasfemar/pYXD
bourar/YXDp
brunir/pYXD
caracterizar/pYXDno
concitar/YXDop
concretar/YXCp
confeccionar/YXDp
criminalizar/YXDnp
decorar/vYcXDp
demonstrar/nYXDvp
depredar/pcYXD
deslucir/D
embicar/YXDp
emprender/YXDp
enganar/YXDp
engrampar/YXDp
esgrimir/vYXDp
estafar/YXpD
faiscar/oYXDnp
falar/YXDpn
refuxir/Dv
incinerar/pYXvDo
intersectar/YpXC
inventar/C
limpar/YXDp
nadar/YXDp
operar/YXcDp
parafrasear/YXDp
privatizar/oYXpD
prospectar/YXCp
reflectir/pYD
regrar/YXnDp
ruxir/YXDp
segar/YXDp
terxiversar/vncYXDp
tourear/YXDp
traballar/YXDp
unificar/cYXDp
vincular/vnYXDp
xogar/YXDp
zumbir/YXDp
agarimar/nYDXp
alumear/YDpnX
ameigar/YDpX
apiedar/YXDp
biselar/pnYXDv
calibrar/vYXDp
carrexar/YXDp
cavilar/oYXDp
descolonizar/Dc
conciliar/YXDpc
reconstruir/D
desmitificar/oD
devastar/cYXDp
dialogar/YXDpn
diminuir/YXDo
emancipar/pnYXvDc
ensarillar/YXDp
entrevistar/vYXDp
estimar/YXDpcv
evocar/cYnXDvp
exacerbar/pYXDo
gaguexar/YXDp
globalizar/YXDpo
gorentar/YpXD
gravar/YXDpc
guiar/YXDp
imprimir/YDXp
indicar/cYDXpn
inibir/YXDpc
instaurar/pcYXD
instituir/YXoD
invocar/cYXDpv
inxectar/YXCp
labrar/YXDp
liberar/YXDcp
normalizar/YXDovp
paralisar/oYXDp
pecar/YXDpn
perxudicar/YXDp
predominar/YXDpon
proibir/pYXDc
protexer/vYDpX
pular/YXDpn
quintuplicar/voYXpD
retribuir/YXDvo
revocar/poYXvD
sancionar/YXDvp
subordinar/oYXpnD
suxeitar/YXCp
universalizar/YXDop
ventilar/YXDp
vindimar/YXDp
vulnerar/oYpXDv
xesticular/pYXDo
zurcir/YXxDp
